Washington statutes.
RCW 35.106.005

Finding—Intent.

The legislature finds that local governments, landlords, and tenants working together to provide crime-free rental housing is beneficial to the public health, safety, and welfare. The legislature is also concerned about activities and provisions that serve to bar a person with a criminal history from obtaining viable housing regardless of other factors that may indicate rental stability, such as employment, rental references, or time in the community with no further criminal activity. It is therefore the intent of chapter 132, Laws of 2010 to provide certain requirements that a local government must follow in adopting a crime-free rental housing program.

[ 2010 c 132 s 1.]